Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1223.
do enact as follows:AB1223,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB1223,29Section 2. 20.235 (1) (cs) of the statutes is created to read:AB1223,2,121020.235 (1) (cs) Teacher, firefighter, and law enforcement tuition loan program. 11The amounts in the schedule for the teacher, firefighter, and law enforcement 12tuition loan program under s. 39.396.AB1223,313Section 3. 39.396 of the statutes is created to read:AB1223,2,151439.396 Teacher, firefighter, and law enforcement tuition loan 15program. (1) Definitions. In this section:AB1223,3,31(a) “Institution of higher education” means an institution or college campus 2within the University of Wisconsin System or a technical college within the 3technical college system.AB1223,3,84(b) “Tuition,” when referring to the University of Wisconsin System, means 5academic fees and segregated fees; and when referring to the technical college 6system, means program fees and additional fees as described in s. 38.24 (1m) and 7(1s) and any amount charged to a resident student for activity, incidental, and 8vocational-adult seminar and workshop fees under s. 38.14 (9).AB1223,3,119(2) Program. The board shall establish and administer a tuition loan 10program for students committed to completing at least 10 years in a teaching, 11firefighting, or law enforcement career in this state.AB1223,3,1612(3) Loans. (a) Under the program established and administered under sub. 13(2), the board shall provide a loan to an eligible student in the amount of the 14student’s total tuition for the semester at the institution of higher education in 15which the student is enrolled. Subject to par. (b), an eligible student may be 16awarded loans under this program as follows:AB1223,3,21171. If the eligible student is enrolled in a baccalaureate degree-granting 18program, the eligible student may be awarded loans for not more than 4 years 19consisting of 8 consecutive semesters. Summer terms are not included in the 20consecutive semester count, and the program funding may not be applied to 21students’ summer tuition.AB1223,4,2222. If the eligible student is enrolled in a program or firefighting training 23component in a technical college in the technical college system, the eligible student 1may be awarded loans for not more than 2 years consisting of 4 consecutive 2semesters.AB1223,4,43(b) 1. No individual may be awarded a loan under this program for more than 48 semesters across any institution of higher education.AB1223,4,652. No individual may be awarded a loan under this section and also under s. 639.398, 39.399, or 39.40.AB1223,4,87(4) Eligibility. A student is eligible to receive loans under the program if all 8of the following apply:AB1223,4,109(a) The student is a resident of this state enrolled in an institution of higher 10education.AB1223,4,1211(b) The student has made satisfactory academic progress, as determined by 12the institution of higher education in which the student is enrolled.AB1223,4,1613(c) The student commits to pursuing a career in any of the following 14professions in this state in a full-time capacity for the 10 years immediately 15following his or her finishing the training or program at an institution of higher 16education:AB1223,4,17171. Teaching in an elementary school, middle school, or high school.AB1223,4,18182. Firefighting.AB1223,4,19193. Law enforcement.AB1223,5,220(d) The student has not already received an undergraduate degree. This 21paragraph does not apply to a student seeking a loan under this program to apply 22towards a semester in which the student is enrolled at a technical college within the 1technical college system for the primary purpose of taking firefighting training or 2earning a firefighting credential.AB1223,5,43(e) The student applies to receive a loan under the program established under 4this section in each academic year in which the student seeks a loan.AB1223,5,115(5) Loan administration. (a) Loans awarded under sub. (3) shall be made 6from the appropriation under s. 20.235 (1) (cs). In each fiscal year, from the amount 7appropriated under s. 20.235 (1) (cs), the board shall allocate one-third of the 8amount for loans awarded to individuals seeking a career in teaching, one-third of 9the amount for loans awarded to individuals seeking a career in firefighting, and 10one-third of the amount for loans awarded to individuals seeking a career in law 11enforcement.AB1223,5,1512(b) Upon the board’s determination that the applicant is eligible to receive a 13loan, the board shall make payment of the loan, on behalf of the student, to the 14financial aid office of the institution of higher education in which the student is 15enrolled in the amount determined under sub. (3).AB1223,5,1916(c) If the amount appropriated under s. 20.235 (1) (cs) is insufficient to fully 17fund loans to all eligible students who apply, the board shall award to eligible 18students as the loan amount the full tuition until the amount appropriated under s. 1920.235 (1) (cs) is depleted, subject to the allocation requirements under par. (a).AB1223,5,2320(d) Except as provided in par. (e), loans under sub. (3) shall be repaid at an 21annual interest rate of 5 percent. The board shall deposit in the general fund as 22general purpose revenue-earned all repayment of loans made and interest on the 23loans.AB1223,6,51(e) 1. The board shall defer repayment of principal and interest on the loans 2awarded under this section while the recipient is enrolled as an eligible student and 3in each year after finishing the training or program for which he or she was 4awarded a loan under sub. (3) if the loan recipient is living in this state and is 5employed in teaching, firefighting, or law enforcement in this state.AB1223,6,1062. The board shall forgive 50 percent of the principal and interest on the loans 7awarded under this section if the loan recipient has lived in this state, and is 8employed full-time in any combination of the professions described in sub. (4) (c) 1. 9to 3., for the 7 years immediately following his or her finishing the training or 10program for which he or she was awarded a loan under sub. (3).AB1223,6,15113. The board shall forgive 100 percent of the principal and interest on the 12loans awarded under this section if the loan recipient has lived in this state, and is 13employed full-time in any combination of the professions described in sub. (4) (c) 1. 14to 3., for the 10 years immediately following his or her finishing the training or 15program for which he or she was awarded a loan under sub. (3).AB1223,6,18164. The board may in its discretion provide exceptions to the requirements 17under this paragraph in order to accommodate certain unforeseen circumstances 18faced by a loan recipient.AB1223,6,2019(6) Rule making. The board may promulgate rules to implement and 20administer this program.AB1223,421Section 4. Effective date.AB1223,6,2222(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 6th month after publication.AB1223,6,2323